Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.116

Civil infraction—Live nonambulatory livestock—Monetary penalty—Authorization by director—Issuance of notices—Enforcement.

(1) Any person found transporting animals on the public roads of this state that are not accompanied by valid health certificates, permits, or other documents as required by this chapter or its rules has committed a class 1 civil infraction.

(2) Any person who knowingly transports or accepts delivery of live nonambulatory livestock to, from, or between any livestock market, feedlot, slaughtering facility, or similar facility that trades in livestock has committed a civil infraction and shall be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars. The transport or acceptance of each nonambulatory livestock animal is considered a separate and distinct violation. Livestock that was ambulatory prior to transport to a feedlot and becomes nonambulatory because of an injury sustained during transport may be unloaded and placed in a separate pen for rehabilitation at the feedlot. For the purposes of this section, "nonambulatory livestock" has the same meaning as in RCW 16.52.225.

(3) The director is authorized to issue notices of and enforce civil infractions in the manner prescribed under chapter 7.80 RCW.

[ 2009 c 347 s 1; 2007 c 71 s 3.]